Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2414
Nursing home or home for the aged or infirm, defined.

Nursing home or home for the aged or infirm means any institution or facility licensed as a nursing facility or a skilled nursing facility by the department pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, whether proprietary or nonprofit, including, but not limited to, homes for the aged or infirm owned or administered by the federal or state government or an agency or political subdivision thereof.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 829.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.